Utah statutes.
40-10-18.2.   Applicability of other chapter provisions.

The provisions of this chapter relating to permits, sureties, bonds, inspections, and enforcement, public review, and administrative and judicial review shall be applicable to surface operations and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine with those modifications to the permit application requirements, permit approval or denial procedures, and bond requirements as are necessary to accommodate the distinct difference between surface and underground coal mining methods.



Enacted by Chapter 49, 1997 General Session

